Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202660-3401
Act, how cited.

Sections 60-3401 to 60-3415 shall be known and may be cited as the Peer-to-Peer Vehicle Sharing Program Act.

Laws 2024, LB1073, § 1.